Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5236.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-13.11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-13.11. Qualifying low-income housing — Assessment and taxation.
Any residential property that has been issued an occupancy permit on or after January 1,
1995, after substantial rehabilitation as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development and is encumbered by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a
governmental unit or Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation restricting either or
both the rents that may be charged to tenants of the property or the incomes of the occupants of the
property, is subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of the property’s previous years’ gross
scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined by each municipality. Provided,
effective January 1, 2026, as to any residential property that is part of section 202 Supportive
Housing for the Elderly Program, 12 U.S.C. §1701(q), or part of section 811 Supporting Housing
for Persons with Disabilities Programs, 42 U.S.C. §8013, or project-based Section 8 housing, that
are utilizing an operating cost basis for reimbursement, those properties shall be subject to a tax
that equals twelve percent (12%) of the property's previous year's gross scheduled rental income,
or a lesser percentage as determined by each municipality. Provided, the twelve percent (12%)
maximum tax shall only apply so long as the property is utilizing an operating cost basis for federal
reimbursement.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000746
========
LC000746 - Page 2 of 3